Utah statutes.
17B-1-209.   Petition certification -- Amended petition.
(1)  Within five days after the filing of a petition, the responsible clerk
shall mail a copy of the petition to the clerk of each other county and the
clerk or recorder of each municipality in which any part of the proposed local
district is located.
(2) (a)  Within 35 days after the filing of a petition, the clerk of each
county whose unincorporated area includes and the clerk or recorder of each
municipality whose boundaries include part of the proposed local district
shall:
(i)  with the assistance of other county or municipal officers from whom the
county clerk or municipal clerk or recorder requests assistance, determine,
for the clerk or recorder's respective county or municipality, whether the
petition complies with the requirements of Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(a) or (b),
as the case may be, and Subsections 17B-1-208(2), (3), and (4); and
(ii)  notify the responsible clerk in writing of the clerk or recorder's
determination under Subsection (2)(a)(i).
(b)  The responsible clerk may rely on the determinations of other county
clerks or municipal clerks or recorders under Subsection (2)(a) in making the
responsible clerk's determinations and certification or rejection under
Subsection (3).
(3) (a)  Within 45 days after the filing of a petition, the responsible clerk
shall:
(i)  determine whether the petition complies with Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(a)
or (b), as the case may be, Subsection 17B-1-205(1), and Section 17B-1-208;
and
(ii) (A)  if the responsible clerk determines that the petition complies with
the applicable requirements:
(I) (Aa)  certify the petition and deliver the certified petition to the
responsible body; and
(Bb)  mail or deliver written notification of the certification to the contact
sponsor; or
(II)  for each petition described in Subsection (3)(b)(i), deliver a copy of
the petition to the legislative body of each county whose unincorporated area
includes and each municipality whose boundaries include any of the proposed
basic local district, with a notice indicating that the clerk has determined
that the petition complies with applicable requirements; or
(B)  if the responsible clerk determines that the petition fails to comply
with any of the applicable requirements, reject the petition and notify the
contact sponsor in writing of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection.
(b) (i)  A petition for which an election is not required under Subsection
17B-1-214(3) and that proposes the creation of a basic local district that has
within its boundaries fewer than one residential dwelling unit per 10 acres of
land may not be certified without the approval, by resolution, of the
legislative body of each county whose unincorporated area includes and each
municipality whose boundaries include any of the proposed local district.
(ii)  Before adopting a resolution giving its approval under Subsection
(3)(b)(i), a county or municipal legislative body may hold one or more public
hearings on the petition.
(iii)  If a petition described in Subsection (3)(b)(i) is approved as provided
in that subsection, the responsible clerk shall, within 10 days after its
approval:
(A)  certify the petition and deliver the certified petition to the
responsible body; and
(B)  mail or deliver written notification of the certification to the contact
sponsor.
(4) Except for a petition described in Subsection (3)(b)(i), if the
responsible clerk fails to certify or reject a petition within 45 days after
its filing, the petition shall be considered to be certified.
(5)  The responsible clerk shall certify or reject petitions in the order in
which they are filed.
(6) (a)  If the responsible clerk rejects a petition under Subsection
(3)(a)(ii)(B), the petition may be amended to correct the deficiencies for
which it was rejected and then refiled.
(b)  A valid signature on a petition that was rejected under Subsection
(3)(a)(ii)(B) may be used toward fulfilling the applicable signature
requirement of the petition as amended under Subsection (6)(a).
(c)  If a petition is amended and refiled under Subsection (6)(a) after having
been rejected by the responsible clerk under Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B), the
amended petition shall be considered as newly filed, and its processing
priority shall be determined by the date on which it is refiled.
(7)  The responsible clerk and each county clerk and municipal clerk or
recorder shall act in good faith in making the determinations under this
section.
